Utah statutes.
39-2-1.   Members -- A body corporate -- Powers -- Expenses.

(1) (a)  The State Armory Board shall consist of the governor, the chair of the State Building Board, and the adjutant general.

(b)  It shall be a body corporate with perpetual succession.

(c)  It may have and use a common seal, and under the name aforesaid may sue and be sued, and contract and be contracted with.

(d)  It may take and hold by purchase, gift, devise, grant, or bequest real and personal property required for its use.

(e)  It may also convert property received by gift, devise, or bequest, and not suitable for its uses, into other property so available, or into money.

(2)  The board shall have power to:

(a)  borrow money for the purpose of erecting arsenals and armories upon the sole credit of the real property to which it has the legal title; and

(b)  may secure such loans by mortgage upon such property:

(i)  the mortgaged property shall be the sole security for such loan; and

(ii)  no deficiency judgment shall be made, rendered, or entered against the board upon the foreclosure of the mortgage; provided, however, that property in one city shall not be mortgaged for the purpose of obtaining money for the erection of armories in any other place.  Said board shall be deemed a public corporation, and its property shall be exempt from all taxes and assessments.

(3)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

